Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.180

Interim permits—License—Expiration upon failure. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

When authorized by the *commission, the department shall issue an interim permit authorizing the applicant to practice registered nursing, advanced registered nursing, or licensed practical nursing, as appropriate, from the time of verification of the completion of the school or training program until notification of the results of the examination. Upon the applicant passing the examination, and if all other requirements established by the *commission for licensing are met, the department shall issue the applicant a license to practice registered nursing, advanced registered nursing, or licensed practical nursing, as appropriate. If the applicant fails the examination, the interim permit expires upon notification to the applicant, and is not renewable. The holder of an interim permit is subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

[1994 sp.s. c 9 s 418.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

PDFRCW 18.79.180

Interim permits—License—Expiration upon failure. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

When authorized by the board, the department shall issue an interim permit authorizing the applicant to practice registered nursing, advanced practice registered nursing, or licensed practical nursing, as appropriate, from the time of verification of the completion of the school or training program until notification of the results of the examination. Upon the applicant passing the examination, and if all other requirements established by the board for licensing are met, the department shall issue the applicant a license to practice registered nursing, advanced practice registered nursing, or licensed practical nursing, as appropriate. If the applicant fails the examination, the interim permit expires upon notification to the applicant, and is not renewable. The holder of an interim permit is subject to chapter 18.130 RCW.

[2024 c 239 s 9; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 418.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.